Hawaii statutes.
[§180C-1] Definitions.
"Conservation plan" or "plan" means a plan for the control
of soil erosion and sediment resulting from a land disturbing activity.

"Conservation standards" or
"standards" means standards adopted within ninety days of the passage
of this chapter by the department of health.

"County" means all the county
governments of Honolulu, Maui, Kauai, or Hawaii.

"Department of health" or
"department" shall mean the department of health of the State of
Hawaii.

"Land disturbing activity" means any
land change which may result in soil erosion from water or wind and the
movement of sediment into state waters or onto lands in the State including,
but not limited to, tilling, clearing, grading, excavating, transporting, and
filling of land other than federal lands, except that the term shall not
include such minor land disturbing activities as home gardens and individual
home landscaping, repairs, and maintenance work.

"Persons" means any individual,
partnership, firm, association, joint-venture, public or private corporation,
trust, estate, commission, board, public or private institution, utility,
cooperative, municipality, and other political subdivisions of the State, any
interstate body or any other legal entity.

"Soil and water conservation
districts" or "district" means a governmental subdivision of
this State, and a public body corporate and politic, organized under chapter
180.

"State waters" means all waters,
fresh, brackish or salt, around and within the State, including, but not limited
to, coastal waters, streams, rivers, drainage ditches, ponds, reservoirs,
canals, ground waters, and lakes; provided that drainage ditches, ponds, and
reservoirs required as a part of a pollution control system are excluded. [L
1974, c 249, pt of §2]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted and definitions rearranged.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next